pl: Funkcja obróbki dynamiki: Kompresor; De-esser; Ekspander; Wzmacniacz wyrównujący; Ogranicznik; Kompresor wielopasmowy; Bramka szumów; Tłumik szumów; Limiter szczytowy; Kształtownik transjentów; Inne
ko: 다이나믹스 처리 기능: 컴프레서; 디에서; 익스팬더; 레벨링 앰프; 리미터; 멀티밴드 컴프레서; 노이즈 게이트; 노이즈 서프레서; 피크 리미터; 트랜지언트 쉐이퍼; 기타
nb: Dynamikkbehandling funksjon: Kompressor; De-esser; Expander; Nivelleringsforsterker; Limiter; Multibåndskompressor; Støyport; Støydemper; Topplimiter; Transientformer; Annet
zh-CN: 动态处理功能: 压缩器; 咝声消除器; 扩展器; 电平放大器; 限幅器; 多频段压缩器; 噪声门; 噪声抑制器; 峰值限制器; 瞬态整形器; 其他
pt-PT: Função de processamento de dinâmica: Compressor; De-esser; Expansor; Amplificador de nivelamento; Limitador; Compressor multibanda; Noise gate; Supressor de ruído; Limitador de picos; Modelador de transientes; Outro
sv: Dynamikbearbetningsfunktion: Kompressor; De-esser; Expander; Nivåförstärkare; Begränsare; Multibandskompressor; Noise gate; Brusdämpare; Toppbegränsare; Transientformare; Övrigt
it: Funzione di elaborazione della dinamica: Compressore; De-esser; Espansore; Amplificatore di livellamento; Limiter; Compressore multibanda; Noise gate; Soppressore di rumore; Limitatore di picco; Modellatore di transienti; Altro
da: Dynamikbehandlingsfunktion: Kompressor; De-esser; Expander; Nivelleringsforstærker; Limiter; Multibåndskompressor; Støjport; Støjundertrykkelse; Peak limiter; Transientformer; Andet
el: Λειτουργία επεξεργασίας δυναμικής: Συμπιεστής; De-esser; Επεκτατής; Ενισχυτής εξομάλυνσης; Limiter; Πολυζωνικός συμπιεστής; Πύλη μείωσης θορύβου; Καταστολέας θορύβου; Περιοριστής κορυφής; Διαμορφωτής παροδικών; Άλλο
pt-BR: Função de processamento de dinâmica: Compressor; De-esser; Expansor; Amplificador de nivelamento; Limitador; Compressor multibanda; Noise gate; Supressor de ruído; Limitador de picos; Modelador de transientes; Outro
en: Dynamics processing function: Compressor; De-esser; Expander; Leveling amplifier; Limiter; Multiband compressor; Noise gate; Noise suppressor; Peak limiter; Transient shaper; Other
nl: Dynamiekverwerking functie: Compressor; De-esser; Expander; Nivelleringsversterker; Limiter; Multiband compressor; Ruispoort; Ruisonderdrukker; Pieklimiter; Transiënt shaper; Andere
de: Dynamikverarbeitungsfunktion: Kompressor; De-Esser; Expander; Pegelverstärker; Limiter; Multiband-Kompressor; Noise Gate; Rauschunterdrücker; Spitzenbegrenzer; Transienten-Former; Sonstiges
fr: Fonction de traitement dynamique: Compresseur; De-esser; Expandeur; Amplificateur de nivellement; Limiteur; Compresseur multibande; Noise gate; Suppresseur de bruit; Limiteur de crête; Modeleur de transitoires; Autre
hr-HR: Funkcija dinamičke obrade: Kompresor; De-esser; Ekspander; Nivelirno pojačalo; Limiter; Višepojasni kompresor; Noise gate; Prigušivač šuma; Ograničivač vršnih vrijednosti; Oblikovač tranzijenata; Ostalo
ru: Функция обработки динамики: Компрессор; Деэссер; Экспандер; Выравнивающий усилитель; Ограничитель; Многополосный компрессор; Пороговый шумоподавитель; Подавитель шума; Пиковый лимитер; Формирователь транзиентов; Другой
lt-LT: Dinamikos apdorojimo funkcija: Kompresorius; „De-esser“ (šnypščiųjų priebalsių sumažinimo įrankis); Išplėtiklis; Lygio stiprintuvas; „Limiter“ (garso decibelų ribotuvas); Daugiajuostis kompresorius; „Noise Gate“ (pašalinio triukšmo slopinimas); Triukšmo slopintuvas; Smailių ribotuvas; Pereinamųjų procesų formuotojas; Kita
hu: Dinamikafeldolgozási funkció: Kompresszor; De-esser; Expander; Szintező erősítő; Limiter; Többsávos kompresszor; Zajkapu; Zajelnyomó; Csúcs limiter; Tranziens formáló; Egyéb
fi: Dynamiikan käsittelytoiminto: Kompressori; De-esser; Laajennin; Tasausvahvistin; Rajoitin; Monikanavakompressori; Ääniportti; Melunvaimennin; Huippurajoitin; Transienttimuokkain; Muu
th: ฟังก์ชันการประมวลผลไดนามิก: คอมเพรสเซอร์; เดอเอสเซอร์; เอ็กซ์แพนเดอร์; เลเวลลิ่งแอมพลิฟายเออร์; ลิมิตเตอร์; มัลติแบนด์คอมเพรสเซอร์; ตัวตัดเสียง; ตัวกดเสียงรบกวน; พีคลิมิเตอร์; ทรานเซียนต์เชปเปอร์; อื่นๆ
vi: Chức năng xử lý động: Bộ nén; De-esser; Bộ mở rộng; Bộ khuếch đại cân bằng; Limiter; Bộ nén đa dải; Noise gate; Bộ triệt nhiễu; Bộ giới hạn đỉnh; Bộ tạo hình thoáng qua; Khác
bg-BG: Функция за обработка на динамиката: Компресор; Де-есер; Експандер; Нивелиращ усилвател; Ограничител; Многолентов компресор; Шумопотискащ; Шумопотискател; Пиков лимитер; Транзиентен формировач; Други
sk-SK: Funkcia dynamického spracovania: Kompresor; De-esser; Expandér; Vyrovnávací zosilňovač; Obmedzovač; Viacpásmový kompresor; Šumová brána; Potláčač šumu; Špičkový obmedzovač; Tvarovač prechodových javov; Iné
tr: Dinamik işleme fonksiyonu: Kompresör; De-esser; Genişletici; Seviyeleme amplifikatörü; Sınırlayıcı; Çok bantlı kompresör; Noise gate; Gürültü bastırıcı; Tepe sınırlayıcı; Geçici şekillendirici; Diğer
zh-TW: 動態處理功能: 壓縮器; 嘶聲消除器; 擴展器; 均衡放大器; 限制器; 多頻段壓縮器; 噪音門; 噪音抑制器; 峰值限制器; 瞬態塑形器; 其他
sl-SI: Funkcija dinamične obdelave: Kompresor; Odstranitev šuma; Razširjevalnik; Izravnalni ojačevalnik; Omejevalnik; Večpasovni kompresor; Šumna vrata; Dušilec hrupa; Vršni omejevalnik; Oblikovalnik prehodnih pojavov; Drugo
cs: Funkce dynamického zpracování: Kompresor; De-esser; Expandér; Vyrovnávací zesilovač; Omezovač; Vícepásmový kompresor; Noise gate; Potlačovač šumu; Špičkový limiter; Tvarovač přechodů; Jiné
ro-RO: Funcție de procesare a dinamicii: Compresor; De-esser; Expander; Amplificator de nivelare; Limitator; Compresor multi-bandă; Filtru de zgomot; Supresor de zgomot; Limitor de vârf; Modelator de tranziții; Altele
es: Función de procesamiento dinámico: Compresor; De-esser; Expansor; Amplificador nivelador; Limitador; Compresor multibanda; Puerta de ruido; Supresor de ruido; Limitador de picos; Modelador de transitorios; Otros
ja: ダイナミクス処理機能: コンプレッサー; ディエッサー; エクスパンダー; レベリングアンプ; リミッター; マルチバンドコンプレッサー; ノイズゲート; ノイズサプレッサー; ピークリミッター; トランジェントシェイパー; その他